Oklahoma, session 2026, SB354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 14-110, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-110. When a municipality has compiled and published
its permanent volume or biennial supplement of penal ordinances, the
governing body of the municipality shall adopt a resolution
notifying the public of the publication. A copy of the resolution
shall be filed in the office of the county clerk in each county in
which the municipality is located. The county clerk shall assign
the filed resolution a book and page number. At least one copy of
the permanent volume and each biennial supplement shall be deposited
free of cost by the municipality in the county law library of each
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB354 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

coun ty wherein the municipality is located, and receipt of same
shall be duly noted in writing by the county law librarian. A copy
of the receipt may be filed with the county clerk who shall then
assign a book and page number. The permanent volume or biennial
supplement of compiled penal ordinances shall be available for
purchase by the public at a reasonable price. Ordinances which have
been compiled and filed in accordance with this section shall be
judicially noticed in all court proceedings. Provided, a court may
consider a book and page reference of the county clerk’s filings as
satisfactory proof of compliance so that judicial notice may be
taken of an ordinance.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB354 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)